Washington statutes.
RCW 11.110.250

Tax Reform Act of 1969, state implementation—Application to trust created after June 10, 1971, or amendment to existing trust.

Nothing in RCW 11.110.200 through 11.110.260 shall limit the power of a person who creates a trust after June 10, 1971 or the power of a person who has retained or has been granted the right to amend a trust created before June 10, 1971, to include a specific provision in the trust instrument or an amendment thereto, as the case may be, which provides that some or all of the provisions of RCW 11.110.210 and 11.110.220 shall have no application to such trust.

[ 1985 c 30 s 134. Prior: 1984 c 149 s 167; 1971 c 58 s 6. Formerly RCW 19.10.250.]

NOTES:

Short title—Application—Purpose—Severability—1985 c 30: See RCW 11.02.900 through 11.02.903.

Severability—Effective dates—1984 c 149: See notes following RCW 11.02.005.